en: Sea igneous white salt for human consumption without enrichment, Rock white salt for human consumption without enrichment
fr: Sel blanc alimentaire marin ignigène non iodé non fluoré, Sel blanc alimentaire marin gemme non iodé non fluoré

en: Sea igneous white salt for human consumption with added iodine, Rock white salt for human consumption with added iodine
fr: Sel blanc alimentaire marin ignigène iodé non fluoré, Sel blanc alimentaire marin gemme iodé non fluoré

en: Sea igneous white salt for human consumption with added iodine and fluoride, Rock white salt for human consumption with added iodine and fluoride
fr: Sel blanc alimentaire marin ignigène iodé fluoré à 25 mg /100g, Sel blanc alimentaire marin gemme iodé fluoré à 25 mg /100g

en: Unrefined salts
bg: Нерафинирана сол
da: Uraffinerede salte
de: Unraffinierte Salze, Naturbelassene Salze, Unraffiniertes Salz, Naturbelassenes Salz
es: Sales sin refinar
fi: Puhdistamattomat suolat
fr: Sels non raffinés, sels naturels
hr: Nerafinirane soli
hu: Tengeri sók
it: Sale non raffinato, sale naturale
lt: Nerafinuotos druskos
nb: Uraffinerte salter
nl: Ongeraffineerde zouten
nn: Uraffinerte salt
sv: Oraffinerade salter

en: Fleurs de sel
de: Salzblume, Fleurs de sel
fi: Suolankukat
fr: Fleurs de sel
hr: Fleurs de Sel
nl: Fleurs de sel, Bloem van het zout

en: Pure sea salt without enrichment
fr: Fleur de sel non iodée non fluorée

en: Grey sea salt without enrichment
fr: Sel marin gris non iodé non fluoré

en: Unrefined rock salts, Unrefined rock salt
da: Uraffinerede stensalte
fr: Sels gemme non raffiné
hr: Nerafinirana kamena sol
hu: Finomítatlan kősó
lt: Nerafinuotos akmens druskos
nb: Uraffinerte steinsalter
nl: Ongeraffineerde steenzouten
nn: Uraffinerte steinsalt
sv: Oraffinerade bergsalter

fr: Sels des marais salants, sels marins gris, sels marins gris de table, sels marins gris de cuisine
nl: Grijze steenzouten

en: Croatian salts
fr: Sels croates
hr: Hrvatske soli
lt: Kroatiškos druskos

en: British salts
da: Britiske salte
fr: Sels britanniques
hr: Britanske soli
lt: Britiškos druskos
nb: Britiske salter
nn: Britiske salt
sv: Brittiska salter

en: Anglesey Sea Salt, Halen Môn
zh: 安格尔西海盐

en: Italian salts
da: Italienske salte
lt: Itališkos druskos
nb: Italienske salter
nn: Italienske salt
sv: Italienska salter

en: French salts
da: Franske salte
de: Französische Salze
es: Sales francesas
fr: Sels français
hr: Francuske soli
lt: Prancūziškos druskos
nb: Franske salter
nl: Zouten uit Frankrijk, Franse zouten
nn: Franske salt
sv: Franska salter

en: Guerande salts
de: Sels de Guérande
es: Sales de Guerande
fr: Sels de Guérande
hr: Gurande soli
it: Sali di Guerande
nl: Zout uit de Guérande

en: Irish salts
da: Irske salte
fr: Sels irlandais
hr: Irske soli
lt: Iriškos druskos
nb: Irske salter
nn: Irske salt
sv: Iriska salter

en: Polish salts
da: Polske salte
nb: Polske salter
nn: Polske salt
pl: Sól polska
sv: Polska salter

en: Kłodawa salt
pl: Sól kłodawska, Sól z Kłodawy

en: Portuguese salts
da: Portugisiske salte
fr: Sels portugais
hr: Portugalske soli
lt: Portogališkos druskos
nb: Portugisiske salter
nn: Portugisiske salt
sv: Portugisiska salter

en: Slovenian salts
da: Slovenske salte
fr: Sels slovènes
hr: Slovenske soli
lt: Slovėniškos druskos
nb: Slovenske salter
nn: Slovenske salt
sv: Slovenska salter